Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Chapter 39. Department of Fish and Game.

Sec. 44.39.010.
Commissioner of fish and game.

The principal executive officer of the Department of Fish and Game is the commissioner of fish and game.

History.

(§ 17 ch 64 SLA 1959)

Collateral references. —

4 Am. Jur. 2d, Animals, §§ 11-15

35A Am. Jur. 2d, Fish, Game and Wildlife Conservation, § 1 et seq.

36A C.J.S., Fish, § 1

38 C.J.S., Game Conservation and Preservation of Wildlife, § 1.

Sec. 44.39.020.
Duties of department.

The Department of Fish and Game shall administer the state program for the conservation and development of the state’s commercial fisheries, sport fish, birds, game, and fur-bearing animals. The Department of Fish and Game shall issue fish and game licenses, collect fish and game license revenue, and do all other acts incidental to the performance of these functions.

History.

(§ 17 ch 64 SLA 1959; am E.O. No. 73 § 14 (1989))

Sec. 44.39.030.
Appointment of commissioner.

The governor shall appoint the commissioner of fish and game from a list of qualified persons nominated by the Board of Fisheries and the Board of Game meeting in joint session, subject to the right of the governor to request additional nominations. The appointment shall be confirmed by a majority of the members of the legislature in joint session. The commissioner of fish and game serves at the pleasure of the governor and may not be appointed for a fixed term.

History.

(§ 17 ch 64 SLA 1959; am § 37 ch 206 SLA 1975; am § 3 ch 14 SLA 1996)

Sec. 44.39.040.
Vacancy.

If a vacancy occurs in the office of the commissioner of fish and game, the governor shall appoint a successor for the unexpired term in the manner provided for the regular appointment.

History.

(§ 17 ch 64 SLA 1959)

Sec. 44.39.050.
Removal of commissioner.

The Board of Fisheries or the Board of Game may submit a resolution to the governor requesting the removal of the commissioner. The resolution shall set out the grounds for the request and the governor shall give the commissioner and both boards an opportunity to be heard. The final decision to remove or retain the commissioner shall be made by the governor. The governor may also remove the commissioner without being requested to do so by a board.

History.

(§ 17 ch 64 SLA 1959; am § 38 ch 206 SLA 1975; am § 4 ch 14 SLA 1996)